Nevada, session 83, SB287.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 338.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.070 1. Any public body awarding a contract shall:
(a) Investigate possible violations of the provisions of NRS
338.010 to 338.090, inclusive, committed in the course of the
execution of the contract, and determine whether a violation has
been committed and inform the Labor Commissioner of any such
violations; and
(b) When making payments to the contractor engaged on the
public work of money becoming due under the contract, withhold
and retain all sums forfeited pursuant to the provisions of NRS
338.010 to 338.090, inclusive.
2. No sum may be withheld, retained or forfeited, except from
the final payment, without a full investigation being made by the
awarding public body.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, it is lawful for
any contractor engaged on a public work to withhold from any
subcontractor engaged on the public work sufficient sums to cover
any penalties withheld from the contractor by the awarding public
body on account of the failure of the subcontractor to comply with
the terms of NRS 338.010 to 338.090, inclusive. If payment has
already been made to the subcontractor, the contractor may recover
from the subcontractor the amount of the penalty or forfeiture in a
suit at law.
4. A contractor engaged on a public work and each
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall:
(a) Inquire of each worker employed by the contractor or
subcontractor in connection with the public work:
(1) Whether the worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or
her gender; and
(2) Whether the worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or
her ethnicity; and
(b) For each response the contractor or subcontractor receives
pursuant to paragraph (a):
(1) If the worker chose voluntarily to specify his or her
gender or ethnicity, or both, record the worker’s responses; and
(2) If the worker declined to specify his or her gender or
ethnicity, or both, record that the worker declined to specify such
information.
 A contractor or subcontractor shall not compel or coerce a worker
to specify his or her gender or ethnicity and shall not penalize or
otherwise take any adverse action against a worker who declines to
specify his or her gender or ethnicity. Before inquiring as to whether
-
*SB287_R1*

– 3 –
a worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or her gender or ethnicity,
the applicable contractor or subcontractor must inform the worker
that such information, if provided, will be open to public inspection
as set forth in subsection 6.
5. A contractor engaged on a public work and each
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall keep or cause to be
kept:
(a) An accurate record showing, for each worker employed by
the contractor or subcontractor in connection with the public work:
(1) The name of the worker;
(2) The occupation of the worker;
(3) The gender of the worker, if the worker voluntarily
agreed to specify that information pursuant to subsection 4, or an
entry indicating that the worker declined to specify such
information;
(4) The ethnicity of the worker, if the worker voluntarily
agreed to specify that information pursuant to subsection 4, or an
entry indicating that the worker declined to specify such
information;
(5) If the worker has a driver’s license or identification card,
an indication of the state or other jurisdiction that issued the license
or card; [and]
(6) The actual per diem, wages and benefits paid to the
worker; and
(7) The total number of hours and overtime hours worked
each day and each week by the worker; and
(b) An additional accurate record showing, for each worker
employed by the contractor or subcontractor in connection with the
public work who has a driver’s license or identification card:
(1) The name of the worker;
(2) The driver’s license number or identification card number
of the worker; and
(3) The state or other jurisdiction that issued the license or
card.
6. The records maintained pursuant to subsection 5 must be
open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the public body
awarding the contract. The contractor engaged on the public work or
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall ensure that a copy of
each record for each calendar month is received by the public body
awarding the contract no later than 15 days after the end of the
month. The copy of the record maintained pursuant to paragraph (a)
of subsection 5 must be open to public inspection as provided in
NRS 239.010. The copy of the record maintained pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 5 is confidential and not open to public
inspection [.] , except to a joint labor-management committee
-
*SB287_R1*

– 4 –
established under the Labor Management Cooperation Act of
1978 pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 175a. The records in the possession
of the public body awarding the contract may be discarded by the
public body 2 years after final payment is made by the public body
for the public work. The Labor Commissioner shall adopt
regulations authorizing and prescribing the procedures for the
electronic filing of the copies of the records required to be provided
monthly by a contractor or subcontractor to a public body pursuant
to this subsection.
7. A contractor engaged on a public work shall not withhold
from a subcontractor engaged on the public work the sums
necessary to cover any penalties provided pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 338.060 that may be withheld from the contractor by the
public body awarding the contract because the public body did not
receive a copy of the record maintained by the subcontractor
pursuant to subsection 5 for a calendar month by the time specified
in subsection 6 if:
(a) The subcontractor provided to the contractor, for submission
to the public body by the contractor, a copy of the record not later
than the later of:
(1) Ten days after the end of the month; or
(2) A date agreed upon by the contractor and subcontractor;
and
(b) The contractor failed to submit the copy of the record to the
public body by the time specified in subsection 6.
 Nothing in this subsection prohibits a subcontractor from
submitting a copy of a record for a calendar month directly to the
public body by the time specified in subsection 6.
8. Any contractor or subcontractor, or agent or representative
thereof, performing work for a public work who neglects to comply
with the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
H
-
*SB287_R1*